Massachusetts, session 194th, S518.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the following new
chapter:
Chapter 57A. Political Party Endorsement
Section 1. An Act to permit certain political party organizational reforms, by allowing a
cross-endorsement process, by which more than one political party, may endorse the same
candidate, and all votes cast for that candidate, may be totaled for that particular individual.
Section 2. Over many years, significant numbers of individuals have desired a greater
range of choices for electing public officials, during election periods. This legislation seeks to
recognize that an additional choice would be provided, by permitting coalitions of different
political designations, and parties, to support, and/or not support, various candidates.
of 2

Section 3. Present Massachusetts law requires independent, individual candidates by each
political party, and/or independent persons. Votes presently, cannot be counted for a single
individual, summed in total. In so doing, political choices are limited to certain definitions, that
limit the ability of coalitions to form, that would improve voter choices.
Section 4. Other states have similar provisions, and have apparently found them to be
useful, and appropriate.
Section 5. The Massachusetts Secretary of State, and its Elections Division, being the
relevant regulator, and supervisor of elections in Massachusetts, is hereby empowered to
establish appropriate regulations, by which all recognized political parties, may cross-endorse
candidates of other parties, by their particular legal political process.
of 2